Utah statutes.
70C-6-104.   Conditions applying to insurance to be provided by creditor.

If a creditor agrees with a debtor to provide insurance:

(1)  the insurance shall be evidenced by an individual policy or certificate of insurance delivered to the debtor, or sent to him at his address as stated by him, within 30 days after the term of the insurance commences under the agreement between the creditor and debtor; or

(2)  the creditor shall promptly notify the debtor of any failure or delay in providing the insurance.



Enacted by Chapter 159, 1985 General Session

